West Virginia, session 2025, HB2237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental Protection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on April 5, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-11-8 of this code, relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (underground injection control, 47 CSR 13), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 82, by striking out the entirety of 14.13. and inserting in lieu thereof a new subsection 14.13. to read as follows: 14.13. Duration of Permits.  UIC permits for Class 1 and 5 wells shall be effective for a fixed term not to exceed 10 years.  UIC permits for Class 2 and 3 wells shall be issued for a period up to the operating life of the facility.  UIC permits for Class 6 wells shall be issued for the operating life of the facility and the post-injection site care period. The Director shall review each issued Class 2, 3, and 6 well UIC permit at least once every 5 years to determine whether it should be modified, revoked and reissued, terminated or a minor modification made.